Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.350

Nursing technicians—Nursing functions.

(1) Nursing technicians are authorized to perform specific nursing functions within the limits of their education, up to their skill and knowledge, but they may not:

(a) Administer chemotherapy, blood or blood products, intravenous medications, or scheduled drugs, or carry out procedures on central lines;

(b) Assume ongoing responsibility for assessments, planning, implementation, or evaluation of the care of patients;

(c) Function independently, act as a supervisor, or delegate tasks to licensed practical nurses, nursing assistants, or unlicensed personnel; or

(d) Perform or attempt to perform nursing techniques or procedures for which the nursing technician lacks the appropriate knowledge, experience, and education.

(2) Nursing technicians may function only under the direct supervision of a registered nurse who agrees to act as supervisor and is immediately available to the nursing technician. The supervising registered nurse must have an unrestricted license with at least two years of clinical practice in the setting where the nursing technician works.

(3) Nursing technicians may only perform specific nursing functions based upon and limited to their education and when they have demonstrated the ability and been verified to safely perform these functions by the nursing program in which the nurse technician is enrolled. The nursing program providing verification is immune from liability for any nursing function performed or not performed by the nursing technician.

(4) Nursing technicians are responsible and accountable for their specific nursing functions.

[ 2003 c 258 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—2003 c 258: See notes following RCW 18.79.330.